Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5845.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46-15.3 of the General Laws entitled "Public Drinking Water Supply
System Protection" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-15.3-5.2. Water supply systems flood resilience plans.
(a) Effective January 1, 2026, all parties involved in the supply, transmission, and/or
distribution of drinking water shall prepare, maintain, and carry out a water supply resilience plan
as described by this section. The purpose of the resilience plan is to identify risks and provide
assessments and emergency response plans to address the resilience of water supply systems to
natural hazards and environmental related impacts. This requirement applies, without limitation,
to:
(1) All municipalities, municipal departments and agencies, districts, authorities or other
entities engaged in or authorized to engage in the supply, treatment, transmission, or distribution
of drinking water on a wholesale or retail basis, referred to herein as "water suppliers" or "water
supplier", and which obtain, transport, purchase, or sell more than fifty million (50,000,000) gallons
of water per year.
(b) The initial risk assessment required pursuant to this section shall be completed no later
than July 1, 2026, and the results of the assessment shall be provided to the governor, speaker of
the house, president of the senate, the director of the department of health and the director of the
department of environmental management. The assessment shall include without limitation:

(1) The risk to the water supply system from natural hazards and environmental related
impacts including, but not limited to, floods, hurricanes and earthquakes;
(2) The resilience of the pipes and constructed conveyances, physical barriers, source
water, water collection, intake, pretreatment, treatment, storage and distribution facilities, and
electronic, computer, or other automated systems (including the security of such systems) which
are utilized by the water supplier to address and mitigate natural hazards;
(3) The financial infrastructure of the water supplier;
(4) The use, storage, and handling of chemicals by the water supplier and the vulnerability
of such chemicals to natural disasters; and
(5) The operational monitoring and maintenance practices and procedures of the water
supplier.
(c) The assessment required by this section shall also include an evaluation of capital and
operational needs to address risk and resilience management for the water supplier, and anticipated
sources of funds shall be identified.
(d) The resilience plans of water suppliers shall document that coordination has been
accomplished with other water suppliers in the vicinity and with operators of wastewater treatment
and disposal facilities serving all or part of the same area or that a good faith effort to do so has
been made. Plans shall be consistent with applicable local comprehensive plans and shall be
integrated into the water supply plans of the municipality or municipalities in which the service
area is located.
(e) Water supplier resilience plans shall designate the person or organization responsible
for taking each necessary action, others who must participate, and the time period in which each
action is to be taken.
(f) Water suppliers shall utilize methods to implement measures necessary to achieve the
objectives of this section. A water supplier shall be required to document the validity or
effectiveness of any measure, implementation method, or other provision or action included in its
plan.
(g) Within six (6) months of any assessment required pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, every water supplier governed by this section shall provide the director of the department
of health and the director of the department of environmental management with a response plan to
address the issues raised in the assessment.
(h) The assessment and response plan required pursuant to this section shall be updated
every three (3) years from the initial assessment pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, with a
report on the updated assessment delivered to the governor, speaker of the house, senate president,
LC001344 - Page 2 of 4

and director of the department of health.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001344
========
LC001344 - Page 3 of 4